Utah statutes.
70A-8-505.   Duty of securities intermediary with respect to payments and
distributions.
(1)  A securities intermediary shall take action to obtain a payment or
distribution made by the issuer of a financial asset.  A securities
intermediary satisfies the duty if:
(a)  the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon
by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or
(b)  in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due
care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to attempt to obtain
the payment or distribution.
(2)  A securities intermediary is obligated to its entitlement holder for a
payment or distribution made by the issuer of a financial asset if the payment
or distribution is received by the securities intermediary.
